Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 43
FOREIGN SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATIONS

Section

11-43-101. Restrictions on foreign associations.

No foreign savings and loan association which conducts a savings and loan business as defined in section 11-40-103 shall operate an office in this state in order to sell its shares or accounts or make new loans in this state. Violation of this section is a class 2 misdemeanor which shall subject the offender and its officers, agents, and representatives, upon conviction thereof, to the penalties which are authorized in section 18-1.3-501 (1), C.R.S., and each separate business transaction in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense; but nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a foreign association from transacting business in respect to executory contracts in force on May 17, 1939.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 324, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 35.

L. 39:

p. 242, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 122-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-4-1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 455, § 2, effective March 18.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1471, § 40, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.